apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="lud/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tyto/ń__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niu</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niowi</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niem</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niu</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niu</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niom</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niami</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niach</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niu</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="szczaw/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iowi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iom</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lokal/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lud"><i>lud</i><par n="lud/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tytoń"><i>tyto</i><par n="tyto/ń__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szczaw"><i>szczaw</i><par n="szczaw/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokal"><i>lokal</i><par n="lokal/__n"/></e>
